Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 14

Dispensing Opticians

63-14-101. Board — Creation — Composition — Appointments — Organization — Duties.

There is hereby created a board to be known as “board of dispensing opticians,” referred to as “board” in this chapter, constituted as set out and with the duties and powers provided in this chapter.

The board shall consist of five (5) members. No member shall be eligible to serve more than three (3) consecutive terms. All appointments shall be made for a term of four (4) years, and members of the board shall serve until their successors are appointed and qualified.

The governor shall make appointments to the board not later than thirty (30) days after the expiration of the term of office of any member. Members of the board may be appointed by the governor from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested optician groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Dispensing Opticians Association, and the governor shall consult with the interested optician groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions. No person shall be eligible for appointment to the board unless the person shall have been a resident of this state and engaged in the practice as a dispensing optician within this state for not less than five (5) years immediately preceding the time of such appointment by the governor; however, no person shall be eligible to appointment who is in any way connected with or interested in any school of optometry, optometric school or the optical or optometric department of any institution of learning or the wholesale optical or optometric supply business. In the event of a vacancy on the board, the governor shall appoint a new member to serve the unexpired term; provided, that such appointment, if not effective within sixty (60) days of the vacancy, shall be filled by the board.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The board shall convene and organize by selecting from among its members a chair and a secretary-treasurer and shall adopt rules and regulations governing the examination of applicants, the enforcement of this chapter and shall establish a code of ethics and standards of practice for dispensing opticians in this state and such other rules and regulations as may be necessary for the proper carrying out of this chapter. The chair and secretary-treasurer thus elected shall serve for a period of two (2) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified.

The board shall provide for meetings at least once each year for the purpose of receiving applications and giving examinations as provided in this chapter and may meet at such other times and places as the board shall designate from time to time by rules and regulations regularly adopted.

The board may administer oaths, summon witnesses and take testimony in all matters relating to its duties.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any and all business that may be lawfully transacted by the board.

The board shall determine the nature and character of the examination to be given applicants for license to practice as dispensing opticians and is empowered to issue licenses with respect to all persons who shall satisfactorily pass the examination as determined in accordance with the rules and regulations of the board. Each license shall be signed by the chair of the board and attested by the secretary-treasurer under its adopted seal. Each license issued by the board to any such applicant shall be signed by the members of the board, and such license exclusively shall be evidence of the right and authority of the person to whom it is issued to practice as dispensing optician within this state.

The board shall not discriminate in the issuance of any license pursuant to this chapter. “Discrimination” means any direct or indirect act or practice of exclusion, distinction, restriction, segregation, limitation, refusal, denial or any other act or practice of differentiation or preference in the treatment of a person or persons because of race, creed, color, religion, sex, age or national origin.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 160, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 66, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1401; Acts 1984, ch. 937, § 50; 1988, ch. 1013, § 52; 1989, ch. 351, § 1; 1998, ch. 1107, § 1; 2001, ch. 234, § 3; 2015, ch. 96, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The regulatory board created by this section is attached to the division of health related boards in the department of health. See §§ 63-1-131 — 63-1-133, 68-1-101.

The board of dispensing opticians, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2021. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-242.

Cross-References. Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777.

63-14-102. “Practice of dispensing opticians” defined — Prohibited practices.

“Practice of dispensing opticians” means the preparation, adaptation and dispensing of lenses, spectacles, eye glasses and optical devices to the intended user thereof on the written prescription of a physician or optometrist duly licensed to practice the physician's or the optometrist's profession and the dispensing of frames as a unit or individually to the intended user thereof.

A person registered under this chapter is specifically prohibited from engaging in the practice of ocular refraction, orthoptics, visual training, prescribing contact lenses or the prescribing of subnormal vision aids or telescopic spectacles.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize or permit any dispensing optician to claim to be able to, or to offer, undertake or attempt, by any means or method, to examine or exercise eyes, fit contact lenses or diagnose, treat, correct, relieve, operate or prescribe for any human ailment, deficiency, deformity, disease, injury, pain or physical condition; however, dispensing opticians may fit contact lenses in the presence of and under the direct supervision of a licensed optometrist or ophthalmologist.

Nor shall anything in this section or in this chapter be construed to require the licensing of persons, firms or corporations that are wholesale suppliers to opticians, optometrists or ophthalmologists, of lenses, spectacles, eye glasses or optical devices or to prevent such persons, firms or corporations from the preparation of lenses, spectacles, eye glasses or optical devices, defined to be the surfacing, fabrication or finishing of any substance or material used or to be used for the correction of human vision, or the adaptation of such lenses, spectacles, eye glasses or optical devices, defined to be the mounting of such a prepared substance or material to frames or to other devices designed to be worn by the user thereof, as long as such preparation or adaptation is done under the written order of an ophthalmologist or optometrist only and as long as such lenses, spectacles, eye glasses or optical devices so prepared or adapted are delivered directly to an ophthalmologist, optometrist or dispensing optician, and as long as such persons, firms or corporations do not engage in advertising as to the price of either the finished product or any part thereof.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 2; 1963, ch. 243, § 1; 1968, ch. 555, § 1; 1972, ch. 760, § 1; 1974, ch. 663, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1402.

Cross-References. Licensed physicians or optometrists exempt, § 63-14-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

63-14-103. Qualifications — Examinations — Display of license — Unlawful acts.

Any person who is a citizen of the United States and of good moral character, and who is eighteen (18) years of age or over and who has satisfactorily completed not less than two (2) years of the prescribed course of a school for dispensing opticians recognized by the board or who has had practical training and experience of a grade and character satisfactory to the board as an apprentice or student under the supervision of a dispensing optician, optometrist or ophthalmologist licensed by the state for a period of not less than three (3) years or the equivalent amount of time under the supervision of such licensed professionals of another state that has dispensing opticianry licensure criteria at least as strict as Tennessee shall be entitled to make application to the board for examination.

The form of application shall be prescribed by the board, and each applicant shall pay the fee provided in § 63-14-107 for the privilege of taking the examination.

If, in the opinion of the board, the applicant possesses the qualifications prescribed in this section and successfully passes the examination, in the judgment of the board, a license to practice as dispensing optician in this state shall be issued to the applicant by the board upon payment of the license fee as provided in § 63-14-107.

Applicants may be examined by the board upon matters pertaining to dispensing opticians and practical subjects, such as practical optic neutralization of lenses, frame measuring and adjustments, pupilary distances and such other subjects essential to the practice as dispensing opticians as the board may prescribe.

Every licensee shall cause such licensee's license to be displayed conspicuously in the office or establishment operated and conducted by the licensee or the office or establishment in which such licensee is employed, and each year, as the license is renewed, such renewal license shall be displayed in the same manner until revoked or suspended by the board as provided in § 63-14-104.

It is unlawful for any person to practice or offer to practice as a dispensing optician as an employee of any person not engaged primarily in the practice as dispensing optician as a licensee under this chapter or of any firm or corporation not engaged primarily in the practice of dispensing opticians under the actual and personal supervision of partners, officers, managers or stockholders who possess valid unrevoked licenses as dispensing opticians entitled to practice within this state in accordance with this chapter.

It is unlawful for any dispensing optician licensed to practice such dispensing optician's profession in accordance with this chapter to be employed by, perform any work in or have any financial interest, directly or indirectly, in the operation of any establishment or place of business that undertakes or attempts to engage in the business of a dispensing optician in violation of this chapter or that advertises in any way that would conflict with this chapter in regard to advertising by a licensed dispensing optician.

It is lawful for any apprentice dispensing optician or student dispensing optician to perform any of the services or do any of the acts included in the definition of dispensing optician contained in this chapter; provided, that such apprentice dispensing optician or student dispensing optician does so under the direct supervision, direction and control of a dispensing optician, optometrist or ophthalmologist licensed by the state or the equivalent amount of time under the supervision of such licensed professionals of another state that has dispensing opticianry licensure criteria at least as strict as Tennessee and practicing in strict accordance with all of the terms and provisions of this chapter; and provided further, that a licensed dispensing optician inspects the finished glasses and fits them to the face of the patient.

It is unlawful for a dispensing optician to publish or display, or cause or permit to be published or displayed, in any newspaper or by radio, television, window display, poster, sign or any other means or media any statement or advertisement concerning ophthalmic lenses, frames, eyeglasses, spectacles, contact lenses or any other optical devices or materials, or parts thereof, that is fraudulent or of a character tending to deceive or mislead the public, including, but not limited to, statements or advertisements of bait, premiums, gifts or other similar nature.

It is unlawful for a dispensing optician to publish or display, or cause or permit to be published or displayed, in any newspaper or by radio, television, window display, poster, sign or any other means or media any statement or advertisement of or reference to the price or prices of any ophthalmic lenses, frames, eyeglasses, spectacles, contact lenses or any other optical devices or materials, or parts thereof, unless such is consistent with the following standards deemed to protect the consumer interest:

Any statement advertising the price of ophthalmic lenses, eyeglasses, spectacles or contact lenses shall, to the extent applicable, be accompanied by a further readily legible statement identifying the lens as single vision, bifocal or trifocal and as clear or tinted and specifying the type of material, the name of the manufacturer, the manufacturer's identifying name or number of the lens and the country of manufacture;

Any statement advertising the price of ophthalmic frames shall be accompanied by a further readily legible statement specifying the type of material, the name of the manufacturer, the manufacturer's identifying name or number of the frame and the country of manufacture;

The price so advertised shall be in effect for a period of not less than seven (7) days, and each advertisement shall set forth the expiration date, if any, of the advertised price. During such time, the item so advertised shall be available to all persons at the advertised price. Any advertised price discounts shall not be limited to any particular group or classification but shall be advertised as being available to all persons; and

Any such advertisements quoting a price or prices shall contain a readily legible statement that the quoted price or prices “Does Not Include Professional Services of an Examining Optometrist or Physician.”

Advertising by a dispensing optician shall be subject further to such rules or regulations, not inconsistent with the foregoing, as may be adopted from time to time by the board in protecting the consumer interest.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 3; Acts 1977, ch. 284, § 1; 1981, ch. 122, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1403; Acts 1992, ch. 905, §§ 1-3; 1997, ch. 463, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Advertisement pertaining to board certification and specialty, § 63-1-145.

Display of license or registration certificate, § 63-1-109.

Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons § 6.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-14-104. Revocation or suspension of license.

It is unlawful for a dispensing optician to act as the agent or representative of any physician or optometrist on any account. The board has the power and it is hereby its duty to suspend for a specified period of time to be determined by the board in its discretion or to revoke or otherwise discipline any person holding a certificate to practice as a dispensing optician in this state whenever the dispensing optician is found guilty of any of the following acts or offenses:

Fraud in procuring a license;

Immoral, unprofessional or dishonorable conduct;

Habitual intoxication or addiction to the use of drugs;

Conviction of felony;

Use of comparative statements or claims concerning the professional excellence or abilities of any person or group of persons licensed to practice their profession under the laws of the state;

Failure to renew annual certificate required under §§ 63-14-106 and 63-14-107;

Offering discounts or inducements to prospective patrons by means of coupons or otherwise to perform professional services; provided, that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the giving of a discount on either merchandise or services to charitable institutions; or

Division of fees or agreement to split or divide the fee received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a customer.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-1404; Acts 1997, ch. 463, § 3; 2018, ch. 745, § 32.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Advertisement pertaining to board certification and specialty, § 63-1-145.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Physicians and Surgeons, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Constitutional Law in 1976-77, I. Freedom of Speech and Press (Kenneth L. Penegar), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 120 (1978).

63-14-105. License not required for employees.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed so as to require an employee of a licensed physician or licensed optometrist to secure a license under this chapter or otherwise be subject to this chapter, so long as the employee remains an employee of the licensed physician or the licensed optometrist entitled to practice that profession within this state. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a licensed physician or licensed optometrist from employing a licensed dispensing optician as defined in this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 5; T.C.A., § 63-1405.

63-14-106. License renewal — Continuing education — Retirement.

The board shall, in its discretion, renew such licensee's certificate of fitness upon application made in due form and upon payment of all required fees. Every licensed dispensing optician must, on or before December 31 of each year, submit satisfactory proof of the licensee's attendance at an education program or programs approved or conducted by the board which consists of the minimum number of hours established by the board under subdivision (a)(1) for the period beginning the preceding January 1:

The minimum number of hours of attendance at education programs so required shall be prescribed by the board by February 1 of each year, but shall not be less than three (3) clock hours nor exceed twelve (12) clock hours in any calendar year;

The board may, in its sole discretion, waive the annual education requirement in cases of certified illness, disability or other undue hardships;

The board shall annually arrange for or approve a program or programs of continuing education sufficient to meet the minimum education requirements under this section;

The board is authorized to adopt such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary or appropriate for establishing an approved program or programs of continuing education pursuant to this section, including, but not limited to, those describing the substantive content of all courses or other forms of education that will satisfy the annual education requirement provided in this section;

The board is authorized to use such portion of the annual renewal fees as it deems necessary or proper to provide for continuing education programs and is further authorized to treat an appropriate amount of such renewal fees collected as state funds for the purpose of accepting any funds made available for the promulgation and maintenance of programs of continuing education;

Failure to meet the minimum continuing education requirements shall be deemed a violation of this chapter, for which disciplinary action pursuant to § 63-14-111(a) may be taken; and

The board shall reinstate a license that was suspended or revoked for failure to meet the continuing education requirements and issue a renewal certificate upon payment of all fees due, payment of a further sum to be set by the board and submission of satisfactory proof that within six (6) months following the date of suspension or revocation the dispensing optician attended the required minimum hours of continuing education programs to make up such deficiency.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person shall file with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit shall state the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board shall deem necessary.

If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 6; 1976, ch. 402, § 1; 1976, ch. 406, § 4; 1976, ch. 470, § 1; 1979, ch. 66, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1406; Acts 1986, ch. 675, § 9; 1989, ch. 523, § 21; 1997, ch. 463, §§ 4, 5.

Cross-References. Licensing, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Retirement, § 63-1-111.

63-14-107. Examination — Renewal — Fees.

Each year, each and every licensed dispensing optician shall pay to the secretary-treasurer of the board an annual renewal fee to be fixed by the board. The secretary of the board shall notify the holder of each license that the renewal fee is due, and the failure to pay such renewal fee by any license holder at the expiration of sixty (60) days after the renewal fee was due constitutes a violation of this chapter.

All applicants for licensure shall include with their application a nonrefundable application fee to be set by the board. Applicants who are accepted for examination shall pay an examination fee as set by the board prior to taking the examination, and the examination fee shall be paid in a manner prescribed by the board. Any applicant failing to pass the examination may apply to take a successive examination by submitting to the board a successive application for examination, which shall be accompanied by an examination fee as set by the board. The fee required to be paid by all persons successfully passing the examination shall be fixed annually by the board, and no license or certificate shall be issued until the fee has been fully paid. All such licenses shall be subject to renewal upon the same terms and conditions as prescribed in this chapter with respect to the issuance of original licenses and renewals thereof.

All applicants for apprenticeship shall include with their application a nonrefundable fee, to be set by the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and shall expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (d).

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 6; 1976, ch. 402, § 1; 1976, ch. 406, § 4; 1976, ch. 470, § 1; 1979, ch. 66, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1406; Acts 1989, ch. 360, §§ 46-48; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 22-26; 1990, ch. 785, § 1.

Cross-References. License renewals, § 63-1-107.

63-14-108. Disposition of fees — Board expenditures and compensation.

All fees coming into the possession of the board shall be paid by the board to the state treasurer and become a part of the general fund.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make allotments out of the general fund for the proper expenditures of the board, and no expenditure shall be made by the board until allotment for the expenditure has been made by the commissioner. Such allotments for the operation of the board shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of the state.

Each member of the board shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) per diem expenses when actually engaged in the discharge of each member's official duties and all legitimate and necessary expenses incurred in attending the meetings of the board. Each member shall be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(118); 1981, ch. 122, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1407; Acts 1998, ch. 1107, § 2.

Cross-References. Disposition of fines and penalties, operating expenses, § 63-1-113.

Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

63-14-109. Secretary — Investigators — Administrative support.

The secretary shall keep an accurate record of the minutes of the meetings of the board and shall keep an accurate and complete register showing the names and addresses of all persons to whom licenses or certificates to practice as dispensing opticians have been issued by the board.

The secretary of the board shall be paid a salary not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per year, in addition to per diem and mileage allowances and necessary expenses as fixed and approved by the board. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The board will employ such investigators as are deemed necessary to effectually carry out this chapter and shall be represented by the attorney named to represent the state regulatory and registration boards.

The board shall receive administrative support from the division of health related boards in the department of health, referred to as the “division” in this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 6; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(118); T.C.A., § 63-1408; Acts 1984, ch. 937, §§ 49, 51; 1997, ch. 463, §§ 7, 8.

63-14-110. Penalties.

Any person who practices as a dispensing optician as defined in this chapter without first complying with this chapter or who violates any of this chapter commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Each time any person practices as a dispensing optician without meeting all the requirements of this chapter and of any other law, a compliance with which may hereafter be prescribed as a condition precedent to the practice of such profession, constitutes a separate offense.

All fines for offenses for the violation of this chapter shall be paid over to the board and shall be paid to the state treasurer as all other funds received by the board.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as applying to physicians or optometrists licensed under the laws of this state to practice their professions, nor shall such licensed physicians or optometrists be subject to the jurisdiction of the board created by this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 7; T.C.A., § 63-1409; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Disposition of fines and penalties, operating expenses, § 63-1-113.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-14-111. Suspension or revocation of license — Injunction.

The board of dispensing opticians may suspend or revoke the license of, or otherwise discipline, any dispensing optician who is found guilty by the board of the violation of this chapter or of the code of ethics and standards of practice for dispensing opticians established by the board in accordance with this chapter; provided, that in all proceedings for suspension or revocation of license, the holder of the license is given fifteen (15) days' notice of the charges made against the holder and is entitled to be heard in person, by counsel, or both.

The penalty for first violations of § 63-14-103(g)-(i) is suspension of the offender's license for a period of time to be set by the board after a proper hearing. A second suspension may be grounds for revocation of the license by the board.

The board is thereby authorized to proceed in any of the courts of this state by injunction to restrain any continued violation of this chapter or of any rule or regulation of the code of ethics and standards of practice for dispensing opticians legally adopted or established by the board in accordance with this chapter. Any dispensing optician whose license is suspended or revoked under this chapter has the right to a review in the circuit or chancery court of the county in which such dispensing optician resides or has a place of business, in the manner provided by title 27, chapter 9.

Acts 1955, ch. 98, § 8; 1977, ch. 284, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1410; Acts 1997, ch. 463, § 6.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).